Georgia statutes. 
(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1984, p. 818, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1393, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 908, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 36; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1575, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 403, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 11/HB 117; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1064, § 1/SB 134; Ga. L. 2018, p. 158, § 2/HB 257.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added the second and third sentences of subsection (c).

Cross references. - Powers and duties of Department of Community Affairs generally, §§ 50-8-2, 50-8-3.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.23.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Report of local government finances, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Coordinated Planning, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Subject 110-3-1.

Grants of the OneGeorgia Authority, Official Compilations of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 413.

36-81-8.1. (See Editor&#8217;s notes.) Definitions; grant certification forms; filing with state auditor; forfeiture of funds for noncompliance; no exemption from liability.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Subrecipient" means an entity that receives a grant of state funds from the Governor's emergency fund or from a special project appropriation through a local government and shall also mean an entity which in turn receives all or any portion of such grant funds from a subrecipient.

(2) "Unit of local government" means, for purposes of this Code section and notwithstanding paragraph (16) of Code Section 36-81-2, a:

(A) Municipality, county, consolidated government, county school district, independent school district, other political subdivision of the state, any public agency or authority of any of the foregoing, or any combination of any of the foregoing;

(B) Regional commission;

(C) Public authority created by local Act or local constitutional amendment of the General Assembly; or

(D) Public authority created by general law which applies to an area of less than the entire state and which requires activation by a county or municipal government.

(b) Each grant of state funds to a recipient unit of local government from the Governor's emergency fund or from a special project appropriation in an amount greater than $5,000.00 shall be conditioned upon the receipt by the state auditor of a properly completed grant certification form. The form shall be designed by the state auditor and shall be distributed with each covered grant as required by this Code section. The grant certification form shall require the certification by the recipient unit of local government and by the unit of local government auditor that the grant funds were used solely for the express purpose or purposes for which the grant was made. Such form shall be filed with the state auditor in conjunction with the annual audit required under Code Section 36-81-7 or 50-6-6 or any other applicable Code section for each year in which such grant funds are expended or remain unexpended by the unit of local government. A recipient unit of local government which is not otherwise subject to the annual audit requirements specified in this subsection shall file a grant certification form with the state auditor no later than December 31 of each year in which such grant funds are expended or remain unexpended. For grant funds to subrecipients, the certification by the unit of local government auditor required by this subsection may also be made by an in-house or internal auditor of the unit of local government who meets the education requirements contained in subparagraph (b)(3)(A) of Code Section 43-3-9. The cost of performing any audit required by this subsection or paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this Code section shall be an eligible expense of the grant. However, the amount charged shall not exceed 2 percent of the amount of the grant or $250.00 per required audit, whichever is less. The unit of local government to whom the grant is made may deduct the cost of any such audit from the funds disbursed to the subrecipient.

(c) Where the grant of state funds is for $5,000.00 or less, the grant shall require submission to the state auditor of a properly completed grant certification form as required by subsection (b) of this Code section except that only the unit of local government need certify that the grant funds were used solely for the express purpose or purposes for which the grant was made. However, where such grant is to a subrecipient, the grant shall require submission to the unit of local government of a notarized affidavit executed by the executive director, president, chairperson, chief executive officer, or other responsible party representing the subrecipient, by whatever name or title, to whom the grant funds are disbursed. The affidavit shall certify under oath that the funds were used solely for the express purpose or purposes for which the grant was made. Such affidavit shall be submitted annually for each year that grant funds are expended or remain unexpended according to a schedule established by the unit of local government and shall be made on a form designed by the state auditor and distributed with each covered grant as required by this Code section.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, or the Appropriations Committee of the Senate shall have the right and authority to direct and require any recipient unit of local government to obtain or perform an audit of any grant of state funds from the Governor's emergency fund or from a special project appropriation, regardless of the amount thereof.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, a recipient unit of local government shall have the right or authority to obtain or perform an audit of any grant of state funds to a subrecipient from the Governor's emergency fund or from a special project appropriation, regardless of the amount thereof.

(e) The failure to comply with the requirements of this Code section shall result in a forfeiture of a state grant and the return to the state of any such grant funds which have been received by the unit of local government. In the case of a state grant awarded to a subrecipient, the subrecipient shall be responsible for the return to the state of any such grant funds if it is determined that the funds were not used for the express purpose or purposes for which the grant was made. A grant recipient or subrecipient shall be ineligible to receive funds from the Governor's emergency fund or from a special project appropriation until all unallowed expenditures are returned to the state, except that a recipient unit of local government shall not be ineligible for such funds where a subrecipient has not used funds it received for the express purpose or purposes for which the grant was made.

(f) No subrecipient shall be considered an agent of the unit of local government or be indemnified or held harmless by the unit of local government for any negligence, misfeasance, or malfeasance of the subrecipient, and a recipient unit of local government shall not be liable for any expenditure of state grant funds by a subrecipient.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-81-8.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1611, § 5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 811, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 36/SB 465; Ga. L. 2006, p. 718, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 16/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2014, p. 136, § 2-2/HB 291.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, "Governor's" was substituted for "governor's" in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(1).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, "Public" was substituted for "Any public" at the beginning of subparagraphs (a)(2)(C) and (a)(2)(D), and "Code Section 36-81-7 or 50-6-6" was substituted for "Code Sections 36-81-7, 50-6-6," in the fourth sentence of subsection (b).

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.23.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

36-81-9. Effect of article on other laws generally.

Statute text

This article shall not be construed to repeal or conflict with any law providing budgetary, fiscal, or auditing procedures more restrictive than those in this article.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 10; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

O.C.G.A. Art. 1, Ch. 81, T. 36 did not repeal by implication a 1961 local law requiring a county board of commissioners to publish "a monthly report or statement in detail of the expenses and disbursements of the funds" of the county and to publish a full statement of the amount of money that was owed by the county and to whom. Eley v. Greene County Bd. of Comm'rs, 258 Ga. 562, 372 S.E.2d 231 (1988).

36-81-10. Effect of article on right to make expenditures and raise revenues; effect on home rule powers.

Statute text

This article shall not be construed so as to prohibit local governments from making authorized expenditures for any lawful purpose or from raising revenues in any manner otherwise authorized by law. It is the specific intent of the General Assembly in adopting this article that local units of government shall continue to have and to exercise their home rule powers as provided by law.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

36-81-11. Budget for implementing security plans subject to approval by the governing authority.

Statute text

The development and implementation of a security plan and all related technology pursuant to paragraph (10) of subsection (a) of Code Section 15-16-10 shall be subject to the annual budget approved for the office of the sheriff by the governing authority.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-81-11, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 560, § 3/SB 462.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Duties of sheriff in implementing security plan, § 15-16-10.

——————————

ARTICLE 2

AUDITS AS CONDITION FOR RECEIPT OF STATE ASSISTANCE

36-81-20. Audits accepted by state; additional audits; section not to limit state's audit authority.

Statute text

(a) Whenever a state agency or a state department requires a unit of local government to perform an audit or whenever a state agency or a state department would perform an audit of a unit of local government as a condition for such unit of local government having received a grant of state money or services, the state agency or state department shall, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, accept any audit which meets the requirements of the federal Single Audit Act of 1984 if such audit includes those moneys or services granted by the state and includes the reporting requirements of any applicable state law or of any state agency.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, a state agency shall be authorized to conduct any additional audits necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities as set forth in state law or regulation, and nothing in this Code section shall authorize any local government or unit or agency thereof to constrain in any manner any such state agency from performing any such additional audit.

(c) This Code section shall not limit the authority of state agencies to conduct audits and evaluations of state financial assistance programs or to enter into contracts for the conduct of such audits and evaluations and shall not limit the authority of the state auditor or any state audit official.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-81-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 758, § 1.)

Annotations

U.S. Code. - The federal Single Audit Act of 1984, referred to in subsection (a), is codified at 31 U.S.C. § 7501 et seq.

——————————

CHAPTER 82

BONDS

Article 1

General Provisions.

36-82-1. Election for bonded debt; right to sell bonds at discount; advertisements as binding statements of intention; use of surpluses; meetings open to public; refunding.

36-82-2. Voting in election for bonded debt; returns and declaration of election result.

36-82-3. Issuance of bonds upon favorable election vote; ordinance or resolution authorizing refunding bonds; issuance, content, and form of refunding bonds.

36-82-4. Action for collection of bonds by holders.

36-82-4.1. Advertisement of bond elections in counties having population of 400,000 to 500,000; use of bond funds.

36-82-4.2. Expenditure of bond funds for purposes other than stated in public bond notice.

36-82-5. Destruction of unsold bonds.

36-82-6. Notice, hearing, order of court, and affidavit of two disinterested witnesses as to destruction of bonds; compensation of witnesses; payment of costs of proceedings.

36-82-7. Authorized investments for bond proceeds.

36-82-7.1. Assessment and collection of tax to pay refunding bonds.

36-82-8. Deduction of sinking fund in computing bonded indebtedness.

36-82-9. Certification requirement for pension obligation bonds; requirement for reserve fund.

36-82-10. Reporting requirements.

Article 2

Validation of Bonds.

Part 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS.

36-82-20. Notice to district attorney or Attorney General of election or resolution favoring issuance of bonds or refunding bonds.

36-82-21. Petition to superior court to show cause; service of petition and order; answers.

36-82-22. Notice of superior court hearing on show cause order.

36-82-23. Hearing and judgment on show cause order; parties to proceedings; appeal.

36-82-24. Effect of judgment of validation.

36-82-25. Entry of reference to judgment of validation on bonds; use of entry as evidence.

36-82-26. Payment of costs of judicial validation proceedings.

36-82-27. Procedure upon failure of district attorney or Attorney General to file petition with superior court generally.

36-82-28. Effect of judgment of validation upon failure to file petition.

Part 2

Validation by Holder of Bonds

Issued by Counties or Munici-

palities Subsequent to Adop-

tion of Constitution

of 1877.

36-82-40. Authorization and procedure generally.

36-82-41. Furnishing of indemnity bond by holder.

36-82-42. Petition by holder to district attorney or Attorney General.

36-82-43. Petition by district attorney or Attorney General to superior court; order to show cause; service of petition and order; answer.

36-82-44. Hearing and judgment; parties to proceedings; appeal.

36-82-45. Effect of judgment of validation.

36-82-46. Applicability of Code Sections 36-82-22 and 36-82-25.

36-82-47. Payment of costs of proceedings.

Article 3

Revenue Bonds.

36-82-60. Short title.

36-82-61. Definitions.

36-82-62. Powers as to undertakings and revenue bonds generally.

36-82-63. Adoption of resolution authorizing undertaking and issuance of revenue bonds.

36-82-64. Issuance of revenue bonds generally; form; terms; signatures; interim receipts; negotiability; nontaxability.

36-82-65. Covenants in resolution authorizing issuance of bonds; article and resolution as enforceable contract with bondholders.

36-82-66. Governmental liability for payment of bonds; recitation on bond.

36-82-67. Right of bondholder or trustee to apply for receivership upon default in payment on bond; procedure for appointment.

36-82-68. Powers and duties of receiver generally.

36-82-69. Limitations on authority of receiver and supervising court.

36-82-70. Supervision of receiver by court.

36-82-71. Surrender of receivership upon cure of default.

36-82-72. Construction of Code Sections 36-82-67 through 36-82-71 and this Code section.

36-82-73. Proceedings for validation of revenue bonds generally.

36-82-74. Notice to district attorney or Attorney General of resolution authorizing revenue bonds.

36-82-75. Duty of district attorney or Attorney General to file petition; order to show cause; service of petition and order; answer.

36-82-76. Notice of hearing on validation.

36-82-77. Hearing and judgment on validation; parties to proceedings; right of appeal; review of valuation of existing undertakings.

36-82-78. Effect of judgment of validation.

36-82-79. Entry of reference to judgment on validated bonds; use of entry as evidence; clerk's fee.

36-82-80. Payment of costs of proceedings.

36-82-81. Procedure when district attorney or Attorney General fails to file petition.

36-82-82. Effect of judgment of validation upon failure to file petition.

36-82-83. Validation of revenue bonds of certain hospital authorities.

36-82-84. Applicability of article to common carriers of passengers for hire.

36-82-85. Construction of article generally; applicability of certain other provisions of law.

Article 4

Bonds.

36-82-100. Expenditure of bond proceeds; auditing.

Article 5

Regulation of Interest Rates for

Bonds and Obligations Other

Than General Obligation

Bonds.

36-82-120. Purpose of article.

36-82-121. Definitions.

36-82-122. Exemption of bonds from Constitution and laws of Georgia regulating interest rates; fixing of rates of interest by resolution or ordinance.

36-82-123. Repeal of regulations as to interest rates contained in other laws.

36-82-124. Construction of article.

Article 6

Form and Services Connected with

Creation of Repayment

Obligations.

36-82-140. Use of facsimile signatures and seals; contracts with financial institutions to perform certain repayment functions; evidence of repayment obligations.

36-82-141. Records of ownership, registration, transfer, and exchange of repayment obligations not public records.

36-82-142. Construction of article.

Article 7

Regulation of Bonds and Obligations Issued by Development Authorities.

36-82-160. Requirements for filing; forms; exemptions [Repealed].

Article 8

Georgia Allocation System.

36-82-180. Short title.

36-82-181. Legislative purpose.

36-82-182. Definitions.

36-82-183. Powers of department.

36-82-184. Determination of state ceiling; records required.

36-82-185. Application for notice of allocation; receipt of application; issue of notice; confirmation of bond issue; certificates under Federal Code.

36-82-186. Economic development share.

36-82-187. Application for economic development share and competitive pool allocation; priority of and approval of application; carrying over; time and amount limitation.

36-82-188. Employment test.

36-82-189. Housing share.

36-82-190. Reservations from housing share.

36-82-191. Applications for single-family bond projects; issue of notice; confirmation; exploration.

36-82-191.1. Allocation of housing share; expiration date of notice of allocation; state and urban housing share set-aside exempt from subparagraphs (b)(3)(A) through (b)(3)(C) [Repealed].

36-82-192. Requirements for applications for qualified residential rental projects; periods for notices of allocation; expiration dates for notices; confirmation of issuance required.

36-82-192.1. Application for single-family project; notice of allocation; waiver of provisions by commissioner [Repealed].

36-82-193. Flexible share for 1990.

36-82-194. Application for flexible pool allocation; issue of notice; confirmation; expiration.

36-82-195. Policy guidelines for making allocations.

36-82-196. Factors to consider in applying policy guidelines.

36-82-197. Transfer of fund from economic development share or applicable reservation component of housing share to the flexible share.

36-82-198. Flexible share carryforward funds.

36-82-199. Carryforward applications.

36-82-200. Mortgage credit certificate carryforward election.

36-82-201. State ceiling deemed allocated and assigned.

36-82-202. Applicability.

Article 9

Trusts.

36-82-220. Definitions.

36-82-221. Sponsoring governmental unit requirement.

36-82-222. Construction.

Article 10

Commercial Paper Notes from Government.

36-82-240. Definitions.

36-82-241. Governed by general provisions on commercial paper; issuance of security by governmental entity; requirements of governing body renewal and reissuance of commercial paper.

Article 11

Interest Rate Management Agreements.

36-82-250. Definitions.

36-82-251. Qualified interest rate management agreements authorized.

36-82-252. Plan required; annual review of plan and report.

36-82-253. Requirements for plans; renewal or termination; provisions and limitations regarding obligation for payment; credit enhancement and liquidity agreements.

36-82-254. Required information in annual financial statements.

36-82-255. Applicability of Georgia law; jurisdiction.

36-82-256. Applicability to prior contracts.

Annotations

Cross references. - Revenue obligations generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI.

Issuance of bonds for purposes of building, equipping, or purchasing sites for school buildings, § 20-2-430 et seq.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - What included in term "bonds" in will, 35 A.L.R.2d 1095.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Article is enabling Act. - Since Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I), concerning the incurring of debts by a municipality, is not self-executing, the General Assembly passed an enabling Act (this article), putting this provision into operation. McKnight v. City of Decatur, 200 Ga. 611, 37 S.E.2d 915 (1946).

It seems manifest that county board of education is proper authority contemplated under provisions of this article to call, manage, consolidate, and declare the result of an election held for the purpose of incurring bonded indebtedness for building and equipping schoolhouses. Nelms v. Stephens County Sch. Dist., 201 Ga. 274, 39 S.E.2d 651 (1946) (decided prior to enactment of "Georgia Election Code," T. 21, Ch. 3; see O.C.G.A. Art. 1, T. 36, Ch. 82.)

Cited in Posey v. Dooly County Sch. Dist., 215 Ga. 712, 113 S.E.2d 120 (1960); Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

School bond election called by county board of education may be held concurrently with general election. 1965 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-9.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Validity, within authorized debt, tax, or voted limit, of bond issue in excess of amount permitted by law, 175 A.L.R. 823.

36-82-1. Election for bonded debt; right to sell bonds at discount; advertisements as binding statements of intention; use of surpluses; meetings open to public; refunding.

Statute text

(a) When any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision desires to incur any bonded debt, as permitted by the Constitution of Georgia, the election required shall be called and held in accordance with this Code section and Code Sections 36-82-2 through 36-82-4.

(b) The officers charged with levying taxes, contracting debts, and the like for the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision shall give notice for not less than 30 days immediately preceding the day of the election in the newspaper in which sheriff's advertisements for the county are published, notifying the qualified voters that on the day named an election will be held to determine the question of whether bonds shall be issued by the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision. The notice shall specify the principal amount of the bonds to be issued, the purpose for which the bonds are issued, the interest rate or rates which such bonds are to bear, and the amount of principal to be paid in each year during the life of the bonds. The notice, in the discretion of the issuing body, in lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which the bonds are to bear, may state that the bonds, when issued, will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest specified in the election notice or, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, that none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate specified in the election notice.

(c) Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the issuing body to sell bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in the election notice.

(d) Every legal advertisement of a bond election shall contain a reference that any brochures, listings, or other advertisements issued by the governing body of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state or by any other person, firm, corporation, or association with the knowledge and consent of the governing body of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state shall be deemed to be a statement of intention of the governing body of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state concerning the use of the bond funds; and such statement of intention shall be binding on the governing body of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state in the expenditure of any such bond funds or interest received from such bond funds which have been invested, unless the governing body of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state uses such bond funds for the retirement of bonded indebtedness, in the manner provided for in this Code section; and such statement of intention shall be set forth in the resolution pursuant to which such bonds are issued. Bond funds and interest received from such bond funds which have been invested shall be expended in the manner in which advertised and for the purpose stated in such statement of intention. The governing body of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state may, by a two-thirds' vote, declare any project which has been established pursuant to any such statement of intention to be unnecessary. In that event, the governing body of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state shall use such bond funds for the payment of all or any part of the principal and interest on any bonded indebtedness of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state then outstanding. Surpluses from the overestimated projects, including interest received on bond funds of such projects, shall be used first to complete underestimated projects and all remaining funds received from interest and overestimated projects shall be used for other projects or improvements which the governing body of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state may deem necessary and which are encompassed within the language of the statement of purpose in the election notice. Any meetings of any governing bodies at which any bond fund allocation is made shall be open to the public. Such meetings shall be announced to the news media in advance and shall be open to the news media.

(e) (1) It is expressly provided that any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state may provide for the refunding of all or any part of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of such county, municipality, or political subdivision without the necessity of a referendum therefor if the governing authority of such county, municipality, or political subdivision adopts a resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of general obligation refunding bonds for such purpose, provided the following conditions are met:

(A) The term of the refunding bonds shall not extend beyond the final maturity date of the bonds being refunded;

(B) The rate of interest borne by the refunding bonds shall not exceed the rate of interest borne by the bonds being refunded;

(C) The principal amount of the refunding bonds may only exceed the principal amount of the bonds being refunded to the extent necessary to effectuate a refund and to allow the reduction of the total principal and interest requirements over the remaining term of the bonds being refunded; and

(D) The proceeds derived from the sale of the refunding bonds, together with the earnings and increments derived therefrom, if any, will be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of, interest, and premium, if any, on the bonds being refunded and shall be deposited in an irrevocable trust fund created for that purpose.

(2) Such refunding bonds so authorized to be issued in compliance with the conditions set forth above, when issued, shall be construed and deemed to be issued in lieu of such original debt being so refunded, and the original debt upon the creation of the irrevocable trust fund and the deposit of the requisite proceeds shall not constitute a debt within the meaning of Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia, but the refunding bonds shall constitute a debt within the meaning of Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia and shall count against the limitation on debt measured by the 10 percent of assessed value of taxable property as expressed therein.

(f) Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed so that a violation thereof shall affect the validity of any bonds issued under this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 40, § 1; Code 1882, § 508i; Civil Code 1895, § 377; Civil Code 1910, § 440; Code 1933, § 87-201; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1032, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1007, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1091, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1581, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 43; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1988, p. 886, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2052, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 355, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1473, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 216, § 1/HB 834.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Further provisions regarding authorization of bonded debt, § 21-2-45.1.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: "The provisions of this Act [which amended this Code section] shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as the provisions of this Act may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Georgia Constitution under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution or the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this Act shall control."

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Sufficiency of Notice

Special and General Laws

General Consideration

Section must be strictly complied with. - In order to render election legal, provisions of this section must be strictly complied with. Bowen v. Mayor of Greenesboro, 79 Ga. 709, 4 S.E. 159 (1887); Mayor of Athens v. Hemerick, 89 Ga. 674, 16 S.E. 72 (1892); Ponder v. Mayor of Forsyth, 96 Ga. 572, 23 S.E. 498 (1895); Smith v. Mayor of Dublin, 113 Ga. 833, 39 S.E. 327 (1901); Berrien County v. Paulk, 150 Ga. 829, 105 S.E. 491 (1920); Allen v. City of Atlanta, 166 Ga. 28, 142 S.E. 262 (1928).

Election not invalid because of disregard of directory provisions. - Bond election should not be declared invalid on account of a disregard of merely directory provisions of election laws when such would not render an election for municipal officers invalid. Brumby v. City of Marietta, 132 Ga. 408, 64 S.E. 321 (1909).

Section 9-13-141 does not affect this section. - Former Civil Code 1895, § 5458 (see now O.C.G.A. § 9-13-141), relating to the publication of notices of sales and orders by certain public officers and others, did not repeal or modify that portion of former Civil Code 1895, § 377 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-1), which required that notice of an election called for the purpose of determining whether bonds shall be issued by a county shall be published for a space of 30 days next preceding the day of the election. Davis v. Dougherty County, 116 Ga. 491, 42 S.E. 764 (1902).

Denial by election to issue school bonds does not impair right of taxation. Ayers v. McCalla, 95 Ga. 555, 22 S.E. 295 (1895).

County has no authority to enter into executory contract. - There is no authority of law for a county to enter into an executory contract for the sale of bonds which, at the time of the contract, the county is not authorized to issue. For a breach of such an undertaking an action for damages will not lie against the county. Robinson-Humphrey Co. v. Wilcox County, 129 Ga. 104, 58 S.E. 644 (1907).

No authority to call election when work lawfully begun. Hogan v. State, 133 Ga. 875, 67 S.E. 268 (1910).

When statute has not been complied with, the issuance of bonds may be restrained by injunction. Bowen v. Mayor of Greenesboro, 79 Ga. 709, 4 S.E. 159 (1887); Mayor of Athens v. Hemerick, 89 Ga. 674, 16 S.E. 72 (1892); Mayor of Perry v. Norwood, 99 Ga. 300, 25 S.E. 648 (1896).

Unnecessary to publish authority of mayor to call election. - It is not necessary to publish the ordinance, or resolution, by which the mayor was authorized to order an election to be held upon the question whether or not such bonds should be issued, provided the notice required by law was duly published. Heilbron v. Mayor of Cuthbert, 96 Ga. 312, 23 S.E. 206 (1895).

No authority to issue bonds for past indebtedness. Mayor of Macon v. Jones, 122 Ga. 455, 50 S.E. 340 (1905).

When separate submissions required. - If it can be said that the proposed improvements are not naturally related or connected, then it is clear that separate submissions are required; if, on the other hand, the several parts of the project are plainly so related that, united, the parts form but one rounded whole, it is equally clear that the parts may be grouped together and submitted as one proposition. Miles v. State, 96 Ga. App. 610, 101 S.E.2d 173 (1957).

Issue of bonds in installments. - Nothing in the Constitution or this section is inconsistent with authorization of an issue of bonds in installments and the levy of the tax for the payment of each installment in the year of the bond's issue. Brady v. City of Atlanta, 17 F.2d 764 (5th Cir. 1927).

Cited in Houston v. Thomas, 168 Ga. 67, 146 S.E. 908 (1929); Gibbs v. Ty Ty Consol. Sch. Dist., 168 Ga. 379, 147 S.E. 764 (1929); Lumpkin v. State, 73 Ga. App. 229, 36 S.E.2d 123 (1945); Hattrich v. State, 116 Ga. App. 281, 156 S.E.2d 925 (1967); Luther v. DeKalb County, 229 Ga. 18, 189 S.E.2d 387 (1972).

Sufficiency of Notice

Requirements as to notice mandatory. - Law requiring notice to be given in a certain way is mandatory, and a failure to comply with the law vitiates the election, if objection is raised at the proper time and in the proper way. Irvin v. Gregory, 86 Ga. 605, 13 S.E. 120 (1891); Davis v. Dougherty County, 116 Ga. 491, 42 S.E. 764 (1902).

Failure to use explicit language treated as irregularity. - Though the notice of the election provided for by an Act may not be in the clearest and most unequivocal terms, when the terms of the notice were such as to show that the question was necessarily to be passed upon in the election, the failure to use more explicit language in this respect (the notice as to all other matters being sufficient) will, after the election has taken place and after the bonds, in pursuance of its result, have been issued and sold and the bonds' proceeds applied as required by the Act, be treated as a mere irregularity not invalidating the bonds, and one of which it is too late for a taxpayer who participated in the election and who had knowledge of all the facts to complain. Brand v. Town of Lawrenceville, 104 Ga. 486, 30 S.E. 954 (1898).

Inadvertently omitting last publication treated as mere irregularity. - When the advertisement prescribed was published once a week for four weeks, and the last publication was inadvertently omitted but the other three were duly made, the omission may be treated as a mere irregularity, if more than two-thirds of the qualified voters actually voted, and if the result has been acquiesced in until after action has been taken on the faith thereof by which substantial rights have arisen. Irvin v. Gregory, 86 Ga. 605, 13 S.E. 120 (1891).

Ordinance not meeting requirements of this section void. - If notice be given under an ordinance prescribing the items of the notice and the ordinance does not meet the requirements set forth in this section, both the ordinance and the notice are void and of no effect. Wilkins v. City of Waynesboro, 116 Ga. 359, 42 S.E. 767 (1902); Shinall v. City of Cartersville, 144 Ga. 219, 87 S.E. 290 (1915); Scott Sch. Dist. v. Carter, 28 Ga. App. 412, 111 S.E. 216, cert. denied, 28 Ga. App. 819 (1922).

Amount of bonds to be issued and for what purpose. - Notice which provides that a given amount should be used for the purpose of building a school, and another amount for the improvement of the water plant, and the surplus, if any, to be used by the mayor and council in such a manner as the mayor and council might see fit, does not meet the legal requirements of a notice which shall specify "what amount of bonds are to be issued, and for what purpose." Smith v. Mayor of Dublin, 113 Ga. 833, 39 S.E. 327 (1901).

Need to state amount of debt to be incurred. - Even if no legislation is necessary to authorize a municipal corporation to hold an election to determine whether a debt other than a bonded indebtedness shall be incurred, an election held pursuant to an ordinance and notice which does not state the amount of the debt to be incurred will not be sufficient to authorize the execution of a contract incurring an indebtedness. City Council v. Dawson Waterworks Co., 106 Ga. 696, 32 S.E. 907 (1899).

Degree of specificity of bond purpose. - When the order and notice of election stated that the proceeds were used in improving and constructing the public roads on a certain county naming the roads to be improved and the order in which the roads were to be worked, such statement is sufficient under this section requiring that the purpose for which the bonds were to be issued should be stated. Moody v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Ga. App. 21, 113 S.E. 103 (1922).

Notice of bond election was not subject to the criticism that the notice indicated that the bonds were to be voted for the purpose of providing funds for two or more distinct purposes, when the purposes stated were all related to providing additions and improvements to school facilities in the county. Miles v. State, 96 Ga. App. 610, 101 S.E.2d 173 (1957).

Publication in paper used by sheriff. - Notice of election for issuance of bonds must be in paper in which sheriff publishes the sheriff's advertisements. Coffee v. Ragsdale, 112 Ga. 705, 37 S.E. 968 (1901); Scott Sch. Dist. v. Carter, 28 Ga. App. 412, 111 S.E. 216, cert. denied, 28 Ga. App. 819 (1922).

Requirement of publication for 30 days. - If the publication was made only twice, on January 21 and February 4, and the election was held on February 5, this was not a compliance with the requirements of the law. Bowen v. Mayor of Greenesboro, 79 Ga. 709, 4 S.E. 159 (1887).
